California statutes. Education Code
(8) To a physician or psychologist authorized by the member to receive medical information, if the system determines that the information may be detrimental to the member, as provided under Section 1798.40 of the Civil Code.

(b) Information filed with the system in a beneficiary designation form may be released after the death of the member or participant to those persons who may provide information necessary for the distribution of benefits.

(c) The information is not open to inspection by anyone except the board and its officers and employees of the system, and any person authorized by the Legislature to make inspections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 298, Sec. 2.   (AB 1325)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

22307.

(a) The board may authorize the transfer and disbursement of funds from the retirement fund for the purpose of carrying into effect this part and Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000). That action shall require signatures of either the board chairperson and vice chairperson, or the signatures of the board chairperson or vice chairperson and the chief executive officer or any employee of the system designated by the chief executive officer.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the board may disburse funds for benefits payable under this part and Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000), for the payment of refunds and for investment transactions. Funds for these purposes shall not require appropriation by the annual Budget Act.

(c) Funds for the payment of administrative expenses are not continuously appropriated, and funds for that purpose shall be appropriated by the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1025, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22307.5.

(a) There is in the State Treasury a trust fund to be known as the Teachers’ Retirement Program Development Fund. There shall be deposited directly in that fund, and not transferred from the Teachers’ Retirement Fund, that portion of employer contributions determined by the board as necessary to fund the expenditures authorized by this section.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the Teachers’ Retirement Program Development Fund are continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years to pay any costs determined by the board to be related to the development of programs authorized by statute that the board determines directly or indirectly enhance the financial security of members, participants, or beneficiaries of the State Teachers’ Retirement Plan, if the board determines, by resolution, the proposed program is to have a reasonable expectation to generate sufficient revenue to carry out the ongoing responsibilities of the programs under development and permit the subsequent deposit of funds, pursuant to subdivision (e), into the Teachers’ Retirement Fund.

(c) The board may authorize the transfer and disbursement of funds from the Teachers’ Retirement Program Development Fund for the purpose of carrying into effect this section upon the signature of either or both of its chairperson and vice chairperson or the chief executive officer or any employee of the system designated by the chief executive officer.

(d) Disbursements of moneys from the Teachers’ Retirement Program Development Fund of whatever nature shall be made upon claims duly audited in the manner prescribed for the disbursement of other public funds.

(e) An amount equal to employer contributions deposited in the Teachers’ Retirement Program Development Fund pursuant to subdivision (a), together with interest calculated based on the actuarially assumed rate of investment return for the Defined Benefit Program for the period beginning with the deposit of employer contributions into the Teachers’ Retirement Program Development Fund and ending with the transfer to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund, on terms and conditions established by the board pursuant to subdivision (b), shall be deposited in the Teachers’ Retirement Fund, from funds generated from the programs receiving development funds pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 780, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22307.6.

The board may, by resolution, direct the Controller to transfer all or a portion of the assets in the Teachers’ Retirement Program Development Fund, established pursuant to Section 22307.5, into the designated fund or account that is authorized to expend funds for the same program for which the assets in the Teachers’ Retirement Program Development Fund were credited, if the board finds that the transfer of the assets of the Teachers’ Retirement Program Development Fund into the designated fund or account would facilitate the efficient administration of the program for which the fund or account was established.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 207, Sec. 5.   (AB 2260)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

22308.

(a) Subject to subdivision (d), the board may, in its discretion and upon any terms it deems just, correct the errors or omissions of any member or beneficiary of the Defined Benefit Program, and of any participant or beneficiary of the Cash Balance Benefit Program, if all of the following facts exist:

(1) The error or omission was the result of mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect, as each of those terms is used in Section 473 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) The correction will not provide the party seeking correction with a status, right, or obligation not otherwise available under this part.

(b) Failure by a member, participant or beneficiary to make the inquiry that would be made by a reasonable person in like or similar circumstances does not constitute an “error or omission” correctable under this section.

(c) Subject to subdivision (d), the board may correct all actions taken as a result of errors or omissions of the employer or this system.

(d) The duty and power of the board to correct errors and omissions, as provided in this section, shall terminate upon the expiration of obligations of the board, system, and plan to the party seeking correction of the error or omission, as those obligations are defined by Section 22008.

(e) Corrections of errors or omissions pursuant to this section shall be such that the status, rights, and obligations of all parties described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) are adjusted to be the same that they would have been if the act that was taken or would have been taken, but for the error or omission, was taken at the proper time. However, notwithstanding any of the other provisions of this section, corrections made pursuant to this section shall adjust the status, rights, and obligations of all parties described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) as of the time that the correction actually takes place if the board finds any of the following:

(1) That the correction cannot be performed in a retroactive manner.

(2) That even if the correction can be performed in a retroactive manner, the status, rights, and obligations of all of the parties described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) cannot be adjusted to be the same as they would have been if the error or omission had not occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22309.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the system shall make available to each active and inactive member, at least annually after the close of the school year, a
 statement of the member’s individual Defined Benefit Program and Defined Benefit Supplement accounts. The system shall mail a copy of the member’s statement, provided the employer or member has informed the system of the member’s current mailing address and the member
 has not requested to receive that annual statement electronically, in lieu of mailing.

(b) The system shall periodically make a good faith effort to locate inactive members to provide these members with information concerning any benefit for which they may be eligible.

(c) The mode of issuance described in subdivision (a) is subject to Section 22337.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 459, Sec. 1.   (AB 989)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

22310.

(a) If a benefit or refund cannot be paid because, after a good faith effort, the member or beneficiary cannot be located, the amount payable shall be returned to the retirement fund until the time the party entitled to payment is located.

(b) Interest shall continue to accrue on the accumulated contributions pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22311.

The board shall maintain all data necessary to perform an actuarial investigation of the demographic and economic experience of the plan and for the actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the plan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22311.5.

The board shall acquire the services of an actuary to do all of the following:

(a) Make recommendations to the board for the adoption of actuarial assumptions that, in the aggregate, are reasonably related to the past experience of the plan and reflect the actuary’s informed estimate of the future experience.

(b) Make an actuarial investigation of the demographic and economic experience, including the mortality, service, and other experience, of the plan with respect to members and beneficiaries of the Defined Benefit Programs; members, beneficiaries, and annuity beneficiaries of the Defined Benefit Supplement Program; and participants and beneficiaries of the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(c) Make an annual actuarial review of the goals regarding the sufficiency of the Gain and Loss Reserves with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program and the Cash Balance Benefit Program and recommend to the board the goal for maintaining sufficient Gain and Loss Reserves for the Defined Benefit Supplement Program and the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(d) Recommend to the board the amount, if any, to be transferred to the separate Gain and Loss Reserves from the investment earnings of the plan with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program and the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(e) At least once every six years with respect to the Defined Benefit Program and annually with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program and the Cash Balance Benefit Program, using actuarial assumptions adopted by the board, perform an actuarial valuation of the plan that identifies the assets and liabilities of the plan, and report the findings to the board. The report of the actuary on the results of the actuarial valuation shall identify and include the components of normal cost and adequate information to determine the effects of changes in actuarial assumptions. Copies of the report on the actuarial valuation shall be transmitted to the Governor and to the Legislature.

(f) Recommend to the board all rates and factors necessary to administer the plan, including, but not limited to, mortality tables, annuity factors, interest rates, and additional earnings credits.

(g) Recommend to the board a strategy for amortizing any unfunded actuarial obligation.

(h) As requested by the board, perform any other actuarial services that may be required for administration of the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2001.   See similar section added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021.)
-------------------------------------------

22311.5.

The board shall acquire the services of an actuary to do all of the following:

(a) Make recommendations to the board for the adoption of actuarial assumptions that, in the aggregate, are reasonably related to the past experience of the plan and reflect the actuary’s informed estimate of the future experience.

(b) Make an actuarial investigation of the demographic and economic experience, including the mortality, service, and other experience, of the plan with respect to members and beneficiaries of the Defined Benefit Program; members, beneficiaries, and annuity beneficiaries of the Defined Benefit Supplement Program; and participants and beneficiaries of the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(c) Make an annual actuarial review of the goals regarding the sufficiency of the Gain and Loss Reserves with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program and the Cash Balance Benefit Program and make recommendations to the board for maintaining a sufficient Gain and Loss Reserves for the Defined Benefit Supplement Program and the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(d) Recommend to the board the amount, if any, to be transferred to the separate Gain and Loss Reserves from the investment earnings of the plan with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program and the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(e) At least once every six years with respect to the Defined Benefit Program and annually with respect to the Defined Benefit Supplement Program and the Cash Balance Benefit Program, using actuarial assumptions adopted by the board, perform an actuarial valuation of each program that identifies the assets and liabilities, and report the findings to the board. The report of the actuary on the results of each actuarial valuation shall identify and include the components of normal cost, if applicable, and adequate information to determine the effects of changes in actuarial assumptions. Copies of the report on each actuarial valuation shall be transmitted to the Governor and the Legislature.

(f) Recommend to the board all rates and factors necessary to administer the plan, including, but not limited to, mortality tables, annuity factors, interest rates, and additional earnings credits.

(g) Recommend to the board a strategy for amortizing any unfunded actuarial obligation.

(h) As requested by the board, perform any other actuarial services that may be required for administration of the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1021, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22311.7.

Upon the basis of the actuarial investigation and actuarial valuation pursuant to Section 22311.5, or any part thereof, the board shall adopt by plan amendment actuarial assumptions, rates, factors, and tables as the board determines are necessary for administration of the plan and its programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 74, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22311.9.

(a) The board shall report to the Legislature on or before July 1, 2019, and every five years thereafter, on the fiscal health of the Defined Benefit Program and the unfunded actuarial obligation with respect to service credited to members of that program before July 1, 2014. The first report shall include the unfunded actuarial obligation and funded ratio as of the date of enactment of this section and compare that with the unfunded actuarial obligation and funded ratio as of June 30, 2018, and the projected unfunded actuarial obligation and funded ratio as of June 30, 2046, based on contributions, and economic and demographic assumptions identified in the June 30, 2018, actuarial valuation. The report shall also identify adjustments required in contribution rates in order to eliminate by June 30, 2046,
 the unfunded actuarial obligation of the Defined Benefit Program with respect to service credited to members of that program before July 1, 2014. Subsequent reports shall include the unfunded actuarial obligation and the funded ratio of the Defined Benefit Program based on the actuarial valuation of the preceding year, and shall identify adjustments required in contribution rates in order to eliminate by June 30, 2046, the unfunded actuarial obligation of the Defined Benefit Program with respect to service credited to members of that program before July 1, 2014. These reports shall be provided consistent with the requirements of Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2046, and as of January 1, 2047, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 47, Sec. 4.   (AB 1469)   Effective June 24, 2014.   Section inoperative July 1, 2046.   Repealed as of January 1, 2047, by its own provisions.   Adding action may become inoperative under conditions prescribed by Stats. 2014, Ch. 47, Sec. 13, subd. (b).)
-------------------------------------------

22313.

(a) No adjustment shall be included in new rates of contribution adopted by the board on the basis of an investigation, valuation, and determination or because of amendment to the Teachers’ Retirement Law with respect to the Defined Benefit Program, for time prior to the effective date of the adoption or amendment, as the case may be.

(b) No action of the board, other than correction of errors in calculating the allowance or annuity at the time of retirement, disability or death of a member shall change the allowance or annuity payable to a retired member or beneficiary prior to the date the action is taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22314.

The system shall inform a member, upon retirement, that future tax liabilities may occur as the result of the pending retirement allowance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22317.5.

(a) The amount of compensation that is taken into account in computing benefits payable under this part to any person who first becomes a member of the Defined Benefit Program on or after July 1, 1996, shall not exceed the annual compensation limitations prescribed by Section 401(a)(17) of Title 26 of the United States Code upon public retirement systems, as that section may be amended from time to time and as that limit may be adjusted by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue for increases in cost of living. The determination of compensation for each 12-month period shall be subject to the annual compensation limit in effect for the calendar year in which the 12-month period begins. In a determination of
 average annual compensation over more than one 12-month period, the amount of compensation taken into account for each 12-month period, shall be subject to the annual compensation limit applicable to that period.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, no member contribution shall be paid upon any compensation in excess of the annual compensation limitations prescribed by Section 401(a)(17) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(c) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1,
 2027.

(2) This section shall become inoperative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1), and this section shall be repealed on July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 16.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed as of July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 17 of Stats. 2024, Ch. 690.)
-------------------------------------------

22317.5.

(a) The amount of compensation that is taken into account in computing benefits payable under this part shall not exceed the following limitations:

(1) For any person who first becomes a member of the Defined Benefit Program on or after July 1, 1996, the annual compensation limitations prescribed by Section 401(a)(17) of Title 26 of the United States Code upon public retirement systems, as that section may be amended from time to time and as that limit may be adjusted by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue for increases in cost of living. The determination of compensation for each 12-month period shall be subject to the annual compensation limit in
 effect for the calendar year in which the 12-month period begins. In a determination of average annual compensation over more than one 12-month period, the amount of compensation taken into account for each 12-month period, shall be subject to the annual compensation limit applicable to that period.

(2) For a member subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013:

(A) (i) One hundred twenty percent of the “contribution and benefit base,” as determined under Section 430(b) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 430(b)), on January 1, 2013, for a member whose service is not included in the federal system.

(ii) One hundred percent of the “contribution and benefit base,” as determined
 under Section 430(b) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 430(b)), on January 1, 2013, for a member whose service is included in the federal system pursuant to any changes in state or federal law enacted on or after January 1, 2013.

(B) The system shall adjust the limit based on the annual changes to the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: U.S. City Average, calculated by dividing the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: U.S. City Average for the month of February in the fiscal year preceding the adjustment by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers: U.S. City Average for the month of February of the previous year rounded to the nearest thousandth. Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 7522.10 of the Government Code, the adjustment shall be effective annually on July 1, beginning July 1,
 2014.

(C) The Legislature reserves the right to modify the requirements of this subdivision with regard to all members subject to this subdivision, except that the Legislature shall not modify these
 provisions in a manner that would result in a decrease in benefits accrued before the operative date of the modification.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, no member contribution shall be paid upon any compensation in excess of the annual compensation limitations prescribed by this section. 

(c) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1, 2027.

(2) This section shall become operative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 16) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 17.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22318.

(a) The initial payment to a disabled member or member retired for disability shall be paid within 45 days following the date the disability is approved, the effective date of the disability retirement or disability allowance, or receipt of all necessary information, whichever occurs last. Monthly payments shall continue thereafter. Initial payments may be based on a good faith estimated amount pending receipt by the system of all necessary employment, dependent, and other public benefit information.

(b) The allowance payable to a disabled member or member retired for disability shall be finalized and a retroactive payment, if one is due, shall be issued within 45 days of receipt by the system of all necessary information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 79.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22319.

(a) The initial payment to a member retired for service shall be issued within 45 days of either the effective date of retirement or receipt by the system of a completed application for retirement, whichever is later. The initial payment to an option beneficiary shall be issued within 45 days following receipt by the system of a completed application for death benefits and proof of death of the member. Monthly payments shall continue thereafter. Payments may be based on a good faith estimate pending receipt by the system of all necessary employment information.

(b) The allowance payable to a member retired for service or option beneficiary shall be finalized and a retroactive payment, if one is due, shall be issued within 45 days of receipt by the system of all necessary information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22320.

The death benefits provided pursuant to Chapter 22 (commencing with Section 23800), Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 23850), and Chapter 24 (commencing with Section 23880) shall be paid to the beneficiary or estate within 45 days of receipt by the system of all necessary information.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 893, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

22321.

The system shall pay interest for delays in excess of the allowable days specified in Sections 22318 to 22320, inclusive. The interest rate for late payments shall be the regular interest rate. Interest payments shall be deemed to be interest earned in the calendar year in which paid. All interest payments under this section shall be paid in addition to any credited interest that is paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, first Sec. 81.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22322.

The system shall report monthly to the board on all late payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, second Sec. 81 [Sec. 81.5].   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22323.

The system shall report monthly to the board concerning outstanding death benefits payable that have not been paid within six months of the notification of the death of the member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 82.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22324.

The board shall file an annual report with the Governor and the Legislature by March 1 of each year on all phases of its work that could affect the need for public contributions for costs of administration of the system, including the subjects of benefits, programs, practices, procedures, comments on trends and developments in the field of retirement, and the following information on the assets of the plan:

(a) A copy of the annual audit performed pursuant to Section 22217.

(b) A certification letter from the system’s consulting actuary concerning the findings of the most recent actuarial valuation, accompanied by analysis of funding
 progress and summaries of the actuarial cost method, assumptions, and demographic data, including actual payroll subject to the system.

(c) A review of the system’s asset mix strategy, a market review or the economic and financial environment in which investments were made, and a summary of the system’s general investment strategy.

(d) A description of the investments of the system at cost and market value, and a summary of major changes that occurred since the previous year.

(e) The annual return on investments and the following information regarding the rate of return of the system by asset type:

(1) Time-weighted market value rate of return on a five-year, three-year, and one-year basis.

(2) Time-weighted book value rate of return on a five-year, three-year, and one-year basis.

(3) Portfolio return comparisons that compare investment returns with universes and indexes.

(f) A report on the use of outside investment advisers and managers.

(g) A report on the nature and cost of investment contract services used, including either the start date of an existing contract or, if there are multiple existing contracts with the same contractor or vendor, the earliest start date.

(h) A report on shareholder voting.

(i) A report for the prior fiscal year on the following information:

(1) The percentage of
 purchasing power protection and any changes adopted by the board.

(2) The extent to which inflation has eroded the purchasing power of benefits provided under the Defined Benefit Program.

(3) The amount of supplementary increases in retirement allowances required to preserve the purchasing power of benefits provided by the Defined Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 864, Sec. 4.   (AB 2663)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

22324.5.

(a) The amendments to this part by the act adding this section during the second year of the 2023–24 Regular Session are consistent with subdivision (e) of Section 22115. The board shall adopt regulations to the extent required in order to continue to administer the statutes accordingly.

(b) (1) The board shall determine a date based on when the system has the capacity to implement the changes made by the act that added this subdivision. The date determined by the board shall be posted on the internet website of the system no later than July 1,
 2027.

(2) This section shall become operative on the date determined by the board pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 690, Sec. 18.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22325.

(a) The system, at least annually, shall identify and provide resources on its website that interpret and clarify the applicability of creditable compensation and creditable service laws in this part and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part. Resources identified by the system shall be relied upon and used for purposes of subdivision (c) until and unless such a resource is revoked or superseded by the system.

(b) New or different interpretations of law, including those that would modify the application of prior interpretations, that differ from the resources identified by the system pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not take effect until after notice is issued to employers and exclusive representatives and shall not be applied retroactively to compensation
 reported prior to that notice, unless a retroactive interpretation is the result of a state or federal law, an executive order of the Governor, or a final court order.

(c) For purposes of audits or any other actions by the system, employers are responsible for complying with the laws and regulations in effect at the time the compensation is reported, except when such laws or regulations are superseded by state or federal law, an executive order of the Governor, or final court order. If the system later determines that compensation reported in accordance with the system’s resources identified pursuant to this section has been reported in error, as a result of an error in those resources, the resulting overpayment to the individual member, former member, or beneficiary shall be deemed an error by the system and shall be recovered pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24616.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 215, Sec. 1.   (SB 432)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22326.

(a) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Advisory letter” means a written determination issued to an employer or an exclusive representative in response to the employer’s or exclusive representative’s submission relating to specific compensation language that is included, or is proposed to be included, in a publicly available written contractual agreement in order for the system to provide formal written guidance for the proper reporting of such compensation consistent with the laws governing creditable compensation and the administrative regulations of the system.

(2) “Material facts” means facts that would have changed the determination made in an advisory letter.

(b) An employer or an exclusive representative may submit to the system a request for an advisory letter.

(c) (1) A submission to the system under subdivision (b) shall be in writing on a form provided by the system and shall include the specific compensation language, a description of the facts related to the compensation language, and the basis of the requesting party’s inquiry, including, but not limited to, specific questions about the reporting of the compensation, and any other supporting documents or requirements the system deems necessary to complete its review.

(2) A submission to the system may be denied if it involves an issue that is in litigation with the system and the employer or a member to whom the advisory letter would expressly relate.

(3) A submission to the system may be withdrawn by the employer or exclusive representative at any time before an advisory letter is provided.

(d) (1) The system shall provide an advisory letter regarding the submission to the employer or exclusive representative within 30 days of the receipt of all information requested by the system, unless an extended period of time is necessary for good cause.

(2) An advisory letter may be superseded by state or federal law, an executive order of the Governor, final court order, or a resource identified pursuant to Section 22325.

(e) If the system later determines that specific compensation reported in accordance with the system’s advisory letter provided pursuant to this section has been reported in
 error by the employer identified in the advisory letter as a result of an error in the advisory letter, the resulting overpayment to the individual member, former member, or beneficiary shall be deemed an error by the system and shall be recovered pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 24616.2.

(f) Only the employer identified in the advisory letter or a member to whom an advisory letter expressly relates may use and rely upon the advisory letter, or offer the advisory letter as evidence of an error by the system. The use and reliance upon, or the offering in evidence of, an advisory letter shall be contingent on a system determination that all material facts related to the specific compensation were disclosed in the submission and the employer reported that specific compensation in reliance on the advisory letter.

(g) This section shall become operative on July
 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 215, Sec. 2.   (SB 432)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22327.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Employment Development Department shall disclose to the system information in its possession relating to the earnings of any person who is a member of the Defined Benefit Program, if the member is receiving a disability benefit or performing retired member activities. The earnings information shall be released to the system only upon written request from the system specifying that the person is a member of the Defined Benefit Program and is receiving a disability benefit or performing retired member activities. The system shall use the information obtained pursuant to this section only for purposes of Chapter 25 (commencing with Section 24001), Chapter 26 (commencing with the Section 24100), Section 24214, or Section
 24214.5. The request may be made by the chief executive officer of the system or by an employee of the system so authorized and identified by name and title by the chief executive officer in writing. The system shall notify members receiving a disability benefit or performing retired member activities that earnings information shall be obtained from the Employment Development Department upon request by the system. The system shall not release any earnings information received from the Employment Development Department to any person, agency, or other entity. The system shall reimburse the Employment Development Department for all reasonable administrative expenses incurred pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 12.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

22328.

(a) Upon termination of a retirement allowance or disability allowance that began to accrue on or after July 1, 1972, the person’s individual account shall be credited with the amount of his or her accumulated retirement contributions as they were on the effective date of retirement or disability, less the sum of all payments made under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 24202, and under Sections 24006 and 24007. The reduction shall not be greater than the total of the accumulated retirement contributions.

(b) Upon the termination of a retirement allowance, the person’s accumulated annuity deposit contribution accounts shall be credited with the amounts of the contributions as they were on the date the annuity became payable because of the retirement less the sum of all payments made under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 24202.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22329.

In order to provide equitable telephone assistance to all members and beneficiaries, regardless of their location in California, the system shall install a toll-free, “800” prefix, line.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 86.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22330.

(a) The board shall provide the Legislature with an analysis of the asset and liability implications of each bill that would affect the investment strategy of the system, the funding of the plan, or the benefit structure of the plan. The analysis shall include an explanation of the methodology employed and the assumptions used in its preparation. Neither fiscal committee of the Legislature shall hear any such bill until the analysis has been provided to the committee.

(b) There is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, from the retirement fund, an amount sufficient to pay all costs arising from subdivision (a), but not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in any one fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 634, Sec. 87.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22337.

(a) The requirements and procedures described in this section shall apply, to the extent that they are applicable, to the following sections:

(1) Section 22309.

(2) Section 22661.

(3) Section 22662.

(4) Section 22663.

(5) Section 22801.

(6) Section 23104.

(7) Section 23203.

(8) Section 24615.

(9) Section 26214.

(b) A communication or other action described in a section listed in subdivision (a) may be made by electronic delivery pursuant to the requirements of this section. The system may
 designate electronic delivery the default method of communication or other action with regard to these sections, provided that the system notifies the parties affected that they have the right to request delivery by mail and that, unless the affected party elects, in a manner specified by the system, to continue delivery by mail, delivery shall be provided
 electronically.

(c) Prior to the designation described in subdivision (b), mail shall continue to be the default method of communication unless the member, nonmember spouse, participant, nonparticipant spouse, or beneficiary has requested that he or she receive that communication electronically, pursuant to a procedure specified by the system.
